North Dakota statutes. TITLE 7 Building and Loan Associations [Repealed]
CHAPTER 7-04 Operation of Associations [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6, effective August 1, 2009]

Note.

Section 6 of ch. 78, S.L. 2007 provides for the repeal of Title 7 effective August 1, 2009.

7-04-01.
Shareholders — Definition — Voting privileges. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-02.
Transfer of shares — Effect — Fee. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-03.
Meetings of shareholders. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-04.
Meetings called by directors. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-05.
Notice of meetings. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-06.
Deposit accounts — Restrictions. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-07.
Shares — Joint ownership. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 82.

7-04-08.
Shares — Ownership in trust — Payment. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-09.
Shares — Fiduciaries, trustees, corporations, and banks — Investments. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-10.
Shares purchased by minors. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-11.
Fund for contingent losses. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-12.
Expenses — How paid. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-13.
Loans to members. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-14.
Advancement of funds to protect liens. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 114, § 1.

7-04-15.
Loans to officers and directors. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-16.
Limitation of loans. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-17.
Repayment of loans. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-18.
Application of share value on foreclosure. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-19.
Conveying property mortgaged to association. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-20.
Reduction of liability to shareholders. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-21.
Unpaid interest not distributable as profits. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-22.
Investment of reserve and undivided profits. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-04-23.
Retention of records — Actions for unpaid balances. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]